Illinois, session 104th, HB3466.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Section 15-178 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/15-178)7    Sec. 15-178. Affordable housing special assessment 8programs; reduction Reduction in assessed value for affordable 9rental housing construction or rehabilitation.10    (a) The General Assembly finds that there is a shortage of 11high quality affordable rental homes for low-income and 12very-low-income households throughout Illinois; that owners 13and developers of rental housing face significant challenges 14building newly constructed apartments or undertaking 15rehabilitation of existing properties that results in rents 16that are affordable for low-income and very-low-income 17households; and that it will help Cook County and other parts 18of Illinois address the extreme shortage of affordable rental 19housing by developing a statewide policy to determine the 20assessed value for newly constructed and rehabilitated 21affordable rental housing that both encourages investment and 22incentivizes property owners to keep rents affordable. 23    (b) Each chief county assessment officer shall implement   HB3466- 2 -LRB104 09604 HLH 19669 b1special assessment programs to reduce the assessed value of 2all eligible newly constructed residential real property or 3qualifying rehabilitation to all eligible existing residential 4real property in accordance with subsection (c) for 10 taxable 5years after the newly constructed residential real property or 6substantially rehabilitated improvements to existing 7residential real property are put in service. Any county with 8less than 3,000,000 inhabitants may decide not to implement 9one or both of the special assessment programs defined in 10subparagraph (1) of subsection (c) of this Section and 11subparagraph (2) of subsection (c) of this Section upon 12passage of an ordinance by a majority vote of the county board. 13Subsequent to a vote to opt out of this special assessment 14program, any county with less than 3,000,000 inhabitants may 15decide to implement one or both of the special assessment 16programs defined in subparagraph (1) of subsection (c) of this 17Section and subparagraph (2) of subsection (c) of this Section 18upon passage of an ordinance by a majority vote of the county 19board. A county opting out shall not disqualify or shorten the 20maximum eligibility periods for any property approved to 21receive a reduced valuation prior to the county opting out. 22The special assessment programs available under this Section 23shall be available to all qualifying residential real property 24regardless of whether or not the property has or is currently 25receiving any other public financing or subsidies or subject 26to any regulatory agreements with any public entity, or both.   HB3466- 3 -LRB104 09604 HLH 19669 b1The changes made to this subsection by this amendatory Act of 2the 104th General Assembly are declarative of existing law and 3shall not be construed as a new enactment. Property is 4eligible for the special assessment program if and only if all 5of the following factors have been met: 6        (1) at the conclusion of the new construction or 7    qualifying rehabilitation, the property consists of a 8    newly constructed multifamily building containing 7 or 9    more rental dwelling units or an existing multifamily 10    building that has undergone qualifying rehabilitation 11    resulting in 7 or more rental dwelling units; and 12        (2) the property meets the application requirements 13    defined in subsection (f). 14    (c) For those counties that are required to implement the 15special assessment program and do not opt out of such special 16assessment program, the chief county assessment officer for 17that county shall require that residential real property is 18eligible for the special assessment program if and only if one 19of the additional factors have been met: 20        (1) except as defined in subparagraphs (E), (F), and 21    (G) of paragraph (1) of subsection (f) of this Section, 22    prior to the newly constructed residential real property 23    or substantially rehabilitated improvements to existing 24    residential real property being put in service, the owner 25    of the residential real property commits that, for a 26    period of 10 years, at least 15% of the multifamily   HB3466- 4 -LRB104 09604 HLH 19669 b1    building's units will have rents as defined in this 2    Section that are at or below maximum rents and are 3    occupied by households with household incomes at or below 4    maximum income limits; or 5        (2) except as defined in subparagraphs (E), (F), and 6    (G) of paragraph (1) of subsection (f) of this Section, 7    prior to the newly constructed residential real property 8    or substantially rehabilitated improvements to existing 9    residential real property located in a low affordability 10    community being put in service, the owner of the 11    residential real property commits that, for a period of 30 12    years after the newly constructed residential real 13    property or substantially rehabilitated improvements to 14    existing residential real property are put in service, at 15    least 20% of the multifamily building's units will have 16    rents as defined in this Section that are at or below 17    maximum rents and are occupied by households with 18    household incomes at or below maximum income limits. 19    If a reduction in assessed value is granted under one 20special assessment program provided for in this Section, then 21that same residential real property is not eligible for an 22additional special assessment program under this Section at 23the same time. 24    (d) The amount of the reduction in assessed value for 25residential real property meeting the conditions set forth in 26subparagraph (1) of subsection (c) shall be calculated as   HB3466- 5 -LRB104 09604 HLH 19669 b1follows: 2        (1) if the owner of the residential real property 3    commits for a period of at least 10 years that at least 15% 4    but fewer than 35% of the multifamily building's units 5    have rents at or below maximum rents and are occupied by 6    households with household incomes at or below maximum 7    income limits, the assessed value of the property used to 8    calculate the tax bill shall be reduced by an amount equal 9    to 25% of the assessed value of the property as determined 10    by the assessor for the property in the current taxable 11    year for the newly constructed residential real property 12    or based on the improvements to an existing residential 13    real property; and 14        (2) if the owner of the residential real property 15    commits for a period of at least 10 years that at least 35% 16    of the multifamily building's units have rents at or below 17    maximum rents and are occupied by households with 18    household incomes at or below maximum income limits, the 19    assessed value of the property used to calculate the tax 20    bill shall be reduced by an amount equal to 35% of the 21    assessed value of the property as determined by the 22    assessor for the property in the current assessment year 23    for the newly constructed residential real property or 24    based on the improvements to an existing residential real 25    property. 26    (e) The amount of the reduction for residential real   HB3466- 6 -LRB104 09604 HLH 19669 b1property meeting the conditions set forth in subparagraph (2) 2of subsection (c) shall be calculated as follows: 3        (1) for the first, second, and third taxable year 4    after the residential real property is placed in service, 5    the residential real property is entitled to a reduction 6    in its assessed value in an amount equal to the difference 7    between the assessed value in the year for which the 8    incentive is sought and the assessed value for the 9    residential real property in the base year; 10        (2) for the fourth, fifth, and sixth taxable year 11    after the residential real property is placed in service, 12    the property is entitled to a reduction in its assessed 13    value in an amount equal to 80% of the difference between 14    the assessed value in the year for which the incentive is 15    sought and the assessed value for the residential real 16    property in the base year; 17        (3) for the seventh, eighth, and ninth taxable year 18    after the property is placed in service, the residential 19    real property is entitled to a reduction in its assessed 20    value in an amount equal to 60% of the difference between 21    the assessed value in the year for which the incentive is 22    sought and the assessed value for the residential real 23    property in the base year; 24        (4) for the tenth, eleventh, and twelfth taxable year 25    after the residential real property is placed in service, 26    the residential real property is entitled to a reduction   HB3466- 7 -LRB104 09604 HLH 19669 b1    in its assessed value in an amount equal to 40% of the 2    difference between the assessed value in the year for 3    which the incentive is sought and the assessed value for 4    the residential real property in the base year; and 5        (5) for the thirteenth through the thirtieth taxable 6    year after the residential real property is placed in 7    service, the residential real property is entitled to a 8    reduction in its assessed value in an amount equal to 20% 9    of the difference between the assessed value in the year 10    for which the incentive is sought and the assessed value 11    for the residential real property in the base year. 12    (f) Application requirements. 13        (1) In order to receive the reduced valuation under 14    this Section, the owner must submit an application 15    containing the following information to the chief county 16    assessment officer for review in the form and by the date 17    required by the chief county assessment officer: 18            (A) the owner's name; 19            (B) the postal address and permanent index number 20        or numbers of the parcel or parcels for which the owner 21        is applying to receive reduced valuation under this 22        Section; 23            (C) a deed or other instrument conveying the 24        parcel or parcels to the current owner; 25            (D) written evidence that the new construction or 26        qualifying rehabilitation has been completed with   HB3466- 8 -LRB104 09604 HLH 19669 b1        respect to the residential real property, including, 2        but not limited to, copies of building permits, a 3        notarized contractor's affidavit, and photographs of 4        the interior and exterior of the building after new 5        construction or rehabilitation is completed; 6            (E) written evidence that the residential real 7        property meets local building codes, or if there are 8        no local building codes, Housing Quality Standards, as 9        determined by the United States Department of Housing 10        and Urban Development; 11            (F) a list identifying the affordable units in 12        residential real property and a written statement that 13        the affordable units are comparable to the market rate 14        units in terms of unit type, number of bedrooms per 15        unit, quality of exterior appearance, energy 16        efficiency, and overall quality of construction; 17            (G) a written schedule certifying the rents in 18        each affordable unit and a written statement that 19        these rents do not exceed the maximum rents allowable 20        for the area in which the residential real property is 21        located; 22            (H) documentation from the administering agency 23        verifying the owner's participation in a qualifying 24        income-based rental subsidy program as defined in 25        subsection (e) of this Section if units receiving 26        rental subsidies are to be counted among the   HB3466- 9 -LRB104 09604 HLH 19669 b1        affordable units in order to meet the thresholds 2        defined in this Section; 3            (I) a written statement identifying the household 4        income for every household occupying an affordable 5        unit and certifying that the household income does not 6        exceed the maximum income limits allowable for the 7        area in which the residential real property is 8        located; 9            (J) a written statement that the owner has 10        verified and retained documentation of household 11        income for every household occupying an affordable 12        unit; and 13            (K) any additional information consistent with 14        this Section as reasonably required by the chief 15        county assessment officer, including, but not limited 16        to, any information necessary to ensure compliance 17        with applicable local ordinances and to ensure the 18        owner is complying with the provisions of this 19        Section. 20        (1.1) In order for a development to receive the 21    reduced valuation under subsection (e), the owner must 22    provide evidence to the county assessor's office of a 23    fully executed project labor agreement entered into with 24    the applicable local building trades council, prior to 25    commencement of any and all construction, building, 26    renovation, demolition, or any material change to the   HB3466- 10 -LRB104 09604 HLH 19669 b1    structure or land. 2        (2) The application requirements contained in 3    paragraph (1) of subsection (f) are continuing 4    requirements for the duration of the reduction in assessed 5    value received and may be annually or periodically 6    verified by the chief county assessment officer for the 7    county whereby the benefit is being issued.8        (3) In lieu of submitting an application containing 9    the information prescribed in paragraph (1) of subsection 10    (f), the chief county assessment officer may allow for 11    submission of a substantially similar certification 12    granted by the Illinois Housing Development Authority or a 13    comparable local authority provided that the chief county 14    assessment officer independently verifies the veracity of 15    the certification with the Illinois Housing Development 16    Authority or comparable local authority. 17        (4) The chief county assessment officer shall notify 18    the owner as to whether or not the property meets the 19    requirements of this Section. If the property does not 20    meet the requirements of this Section, the chief county 21    assessment officer shall provide written notice of any 22    deficiencies to the owner, who shall then have 30 days 23    from the date of notification to provide supplemental 24    information showing compliance with this Section. The 25    chief county assessment officer shall, in its discretion, 26    grant additional time to cure any deficiency. If the owner   HB3466- 11 -LRB104 09604 HLH 19669 b1    does not exercise this right to cure the deficiency, or if 2    the information submitted, in the sole judgment of the 3    chief county assessment officer, is insufficient to meet 4    the requirements of this Section, the chief county 5    assessment officer shall provide a written explanation of 6    the reasons for denial. 7        (5) The chief county assessment officer may charge a 8    reasonable application fee to offset the administrative 9    expenses associated with the program. 10        (6) The reduced valuation conferred by this Section is 11    limited as follows: 12            (A) The owner is eligible to apply for the reduced 13        valuation conferred by this Section beginning in the 14        first assessment year after the effective date of this 15        amendatory Act of the 102nd General Assembly through 16        December 31, 2037 2027. If approved, the reduction 17        will be effective for the current assessment year, 18        which will be reflected in the tax bill issued in the 19        following calendar year. Owners that are approved for 20        the reduced valuation under paragraph (1) of 21        subsection (c) of this Section before December 31, 22        2027 shall, at minimum, be eligible for annual renewal 23        of the reduced valuation during an initial 10-year 24        period if annual certification requirements are met 25        for each of the 10 years, as described in subparagraph 26        (B) of paragraph (4) of subsection (d) of this   HB3466- 12 -LRB104 09604 HLH 19669 b1        Section. If an owner is approved for the reduced 2        valuation conferred by this Section prior to December 3        31, 2037 and this Section is not subsequently 4        extended, this shall not disqualify or shorten the 5        maximum eligibility periods for any property approved 6        to receive a reduced valuation. 7            (B) Property receiving a reduction outlined in 8        paragraph (1) of subsection (c) of this Section shall 9        continue to be eligible for an initial period of up to 10        10 years if annual certification requirements are met 11        for each of the 10 years, but shall be extended for up 12        to 2 additional 10-year periods with annual renewals 13        if the owner continues to meet the requirements of 14        this Section, including annual certifications, and 15        excluding the requirements regarding new construction 16        or qualifying rehabilitation defined in subparagraph 17        (D) of paragraph (1) of this subsection. 18            (C) The annual certification materials in the year 19        prior to final year of eligibility for the reduction 20        in assessed value must include a dated copy of the 21        written notice provided to tenants informing them of 22        the date of the termination if the owner is not seeking 23        a renewal. 24            (D) If the property is sold or transferred, the 25        purchaser or transferee must comply with all 26        requirements of this Section, excluding the   HB3466- 13 -LRB104 09604 HLH 19669 b1        requirements regarding new construction or qualifying 2        rehabilitation defined in subparagraph (D) of 3        paragraph (1) of this subsection, in order to continue 4        receiving the reduction in assessed value. Purchasers 5        and transferees who comply with all requirements of 6        this Section excluding the requirements regarding new 7        construction or qualifying rehabilitation defined in 8        subparagraph (D) of paragraph (1) of this subsection 9        are eligible to apply for renewal on the schedule set 10        by the initial application. 11            (E) (Blank). The owner may apply for the reduced 12        valuation if the residential real property meets all 13        requirements of this Section and the newly constructed 14        residential real property or improvements to existing 15        residential real property were put in service on or 16        after January 1, 2015. However, the initial 10-year 17        eligibility period or 30-year eligibility period, 18        depending on the applicable program, shall be reduced 19        by the number of years between the placed in service 20        date and the date the owner first receives this 21        reduced valuation. 22            (F) The owner may apply for the reduced valuation 23        within 2 years after the newly constructed residential 24        real property or improvements to existing residential 25        real property are put in service. However, the initial 26        10-year eligibility period or 30-year eligibility   HB3466- 14 -LRB104 09604 HLH 19669 b1        period, depending on the applicable program, shall be 2        reduced for the number of years between the placed in 3        service date and the date the owner first receives 4        this reduced valuation. 5            (G) Owners of a multifamily building receiving a 6        reduced valuation through the Cook County Class 9 7        program during the year in which this amendatory Act 8        of the 102nd General Assembly takes effect shall be 9        deemed automatically eligible for the reduced 10        valuation defined in paragraph (1) of subsection (c) 11        of this Section in terms of meeting the criteria for 12        new construction or substantial rehabilitation for a 13        specific multifamily building regardless of when the 14        newly constructed residential real property or 15        improvements to existing residential real property 16        were put in service. If a Cook County Class 9 owner had 17        Class 9 status revoked on or after January 1, 2017 but 18        can provide documents sufficient to prove that the 19        revocation was in error or any deficiencies leading to 20        the revocation have been cured, the chief county 21        assessment officer may deem the owner to be eligible. 22        However, owners may not receive both the reduced 23        valuation under this Section and the reduced valuation 24        under the Cook County Class 9 program in any single 25        assessment year. In addition, the number of years 26        during which an owner has participated in the Class 9   HB3466- 15 -LRB104 09604 HLH 19669 b1        program shall count against the 3 10-year periods of 2        eligibility for the reduced valuation as defined in 3        subparagraph (1) of subsection (c) of this Section. 4            (H) At the completion of the assessment reduction 5        period described in this Section: the entire parcel 6        will be assessed as otherwise provided by law. 7        (7) If the chief county assessment officer has not 8    created application forms, the chief county assessment 9    officer shall make publicly available and accept 10    applications forms that shall be available to local 11    governments from the Illinois Department of Revenue. If a 12    county Internet website exists, the application materials, 13    as well as any other program requirements used by the 14    county (such as application deadlines, fees, and other 15    procedures required by the application) must be published 16    on that website, otherwise it must be available to the 17    public upon request at the office of the chief county 18    assessment officer. 19    (g) As used in this Section: 20    "Affordable units" means units that have rents that do not 21exceed the maximum rents as defined in this Section. 22    "Assessed value for the residential real property in the 23base year" means the assessed value used to calculate the tax 24bill, as certified by the board of review, for the tax year 25immediately prior to the tax year in which the building permit 26is issued. For property assessed as other than residential   HB3466- 16 -LRB104 09604 HLH 19669 b1property, the "assessed value for the residential real 2property in the base year" means the assessed value that would 3have been obtained had the property been classified as 4residential as derived from the board of review's certified 5market value. 6    "Household income" includes the annual income for all the 7people who occupy a housing unit that is anticipated to be 8received from a source outside of the family during the 912-month period following admission or the annual 10recertification, including related family members and all the 11unrelated people who share the housing unit. Household income 12includes the total of the following income sources: wages, 13salaries and tips before any payroll deductions; net business 14income; interest and dividends; payments in lieu of earnings, 15such as unemployment and disability compensation, worker's 16compensation and severance pay; Social Security income, 17including lump sum payments; payments from insurance policies, 18annuities, pensions, disability benefits and other types of 19periodic payments, alimony, child support, and other regular 20monetary contributions; and public assistance, except for 21assistance from the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program 22(SNAP). "Household income" does not include: earnings of 23children under age 18; temporary income such as cash gifts; 24reimbursement for medical expenses; lump sums from 25inheritance, insurance payments, settlements for personal or 26property losses; student financial assistance paid directly to   HB3466- 17 -LRB104 09604 HLH 19669 b1the student or to an educational institution; foster child 2care payments; receipts from government-funded training 3programs; assistance from the Supplemental Nutrition 4Assistance Program (SNAP). 5    "Low affordability community" means (1) a municipality or 6jurisdiction with less than 1,000,000 inhabitants in which 40% 7or less of its total year-round housing units are affordable, 8as determined by the Illinois Housing Development Authority 9during the exemption determination process under the 10Affordable Housing Planning and Appeal Act; (2) "D" zoning 11districts as now or hereafter designated in the Chicago Zoning 12Ordinance; or (3) a jurisdiction located in a municipality 13with 1,000,000 or more inhabitants that has been designated as 14a low affordability community by passage of a local ordinance 15by that municipality, specifying the census tract or property 16by permanent index number or numbers. 17    "Maximum income limits" means the maximum regular income 18limits for 60% of area median income for the geographic area in 19which the multifamily building is located for multifamily 20programs as determined by the United States Department of 21Housing and Urban Development and published annually by the 22Illinois Housing Development Authority. A property may be 23deemed to have satisfied the maximum income limits with a 24weighted average if municipal, state, or federal laws, 25ordinances, rules, or regulations requires the use of a 26weighted average of no more than 60% of area median income for   HB3466- 18 -LRB104 09604 HLH 19669 b1that property. 2    "Maximum rent" means the maximum regular rent for 60% of 3the area median income for the geographic area in which the 4multifamily building is located for multifamily programs as 5determined by the United States Department of Housing and 6Urban Development and published annually by the Illinois 7Housing Development Authority. To be eligible for the reduced 8valuation defined in this Section, maximum rents are to be 9consistent with the Illinois Housing Development Authority's 10rules; or if the owner is leasing an affordable unit to a 11household with an income at or below the maximum income limit 12who is participating in qualifying income-based rental subsidy 13program, "maximum rent" means the maximum rents allowable 14under the guidelines of the qualifying income-based rental 15subsidy program. A property may be deemed to have satisfied 16the maximum rent with a weighted average if municipal, state, 17or federal laws, ordinances, rules, or regulations requires 18the use of a weighted average of no more than 60% of area 19median income for that property. 20    "Qualifying income-based rental subsidy program" means a 21Housing Choice Voucher issued by a housing authority under 22Section 8 of the United States Housing Act of 1937, a tenant 23voucher converted to a project-based voucher by a housing 24authority or any other program administered or funded by a 25housing authority, the Illinois Housing Development Authority, 26another State agency, a federal agency, or a unit of local   HB3466- 19 -LRB104 09604 HLH 19669 b1government where participation is limited to households with 2incomes at or below the maximum income limits as defined in 3this Section and the tenants' portion of the rent payment is 4based on a percentage of their income or a flat amount that 5does not exceed the maximum rent as defined in this Section.6    "Qualifying rehabilitation" means, at a minimum, 7compliance with local building codes and the replacement or 8renovation of at least 2 primary building systems to be 9approved for the reduced valuation under paragraph (1) of 10subsection (d) of this Section and at least 5 primary building 11systems to be approved for the reduced valuation under 12subsection (e) of this Section. Although the cost of each 13primary building system may vary, to be approved for the 14reduced valuation under paragraph (1) of subsection (d) of 15this Section, the combined expenditure for making the building 16compliant with local codes and replacing primary building 17systems must be at least $8 per square foot for work completed 18between January 1 of the year in which this amendatory Act of 19the 102nd General Assembly takes effect and December 31 of the 20year in which this amendatory Act of the 102nd General 21Assembly takes effect and, in subsequent years, $8 adjusted by 22the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers, as published 23annually by the U.S. Department of Labor. To be approved for 24the reduced valuation under paragraph (2) of subsection (d) of 25this Section, the combined expenditure for making the building 26compliant with local codes and replacing primary building   HB3466- 20 -LRB104 09604 HLH 19669 b1systems must be at least $12.50 per square foot for work 2completed between January 1 of the year in which this 3amendatory Act of the 102nd General Assembly takes effect and 4December 31 of the year in which this amendatory Act of the 5102nd General Assembly takes effect, and in subsequent years, 6$12.50 adjusted by the Consumer Price Index for All Urban 7Consumers, as published annually by the U.S. Department of 8Labor. To be approved for the reduced valuation under 9subsection (e) of this Section, the combined expenditure for 10making the building compliant with local codes and replacing 11primary building systems must be at least $60 per square foot 12for work completed between January 1 of the year that this 13amendatory Act of the 102nd General Assembly becomes effective 14and December 31 of the year that this amendatory Act of the 15102nd General Assembly becomes effective and, in subsequent 16years, $60 adjusted by the Consumer Price Index for All Urban 17Consumers, as published annually by the U.S. Department of 18Labor. On an annual basis, the Illinois Housing Development 19Authority shall calculate and make available on its website 20the minimum per square foot expenditure requirements to be 21applicable statewide to be eligible for the reduced valuation 22available under paragraphs (1) and (2) of subsection (d) of 23this Section and subsection (e) of this Section. This shall 24include the historical annual expenditure requirements 25starting with calendar year 2021. "Primary building systems", 26together with their related rehabilitations, specifically   HB3466- 21 -LRB104 09604 HLH 19669 b1approved for this program are: 2        (1) Electrical. All electrical work must comply with 3    applicable codes; it may consist of a combination of any 4    of the following alternatives: 5            (A) installing individual equipment and appliance 6        branch circuits as required by code (the minimum being 7        a kitchen appliance branch circuit); 8            (B) installing a new emergency service, including 9        emergency lighting with all associated conduits and 10        wiring; 11            (C) rewiring all existing feeder conduits ("home 12        runs") from the main switchgear to apartment area 13        distribution panels;14            (D) installing new in-wall conduits for 15        receptacles, switches, appliances, equipment, and 16        fixtures; 17            (E) replacing power wiring for receptacles, 18        switches, appliances, equipment, and fixtures; 19            (F) installing new light fixtures throughout the 20        building including closets and central areas; 21            (G) replacing, adding, or doing work as necessary 22        to bring all receptacles, switches, and other 23        electrical devices into code compliance; 24            (H) installing a new main service, including 25        conduit, cables into the building, and main disconnect 26        switch; and   HB3466- 22 -LRB104 09604 HLH 19669 b1            (I) installing new distribution panels, including 2        all panel wiring, terminals, circuit breakers, and all 3        other panel devices. 4        (2) Heating. All heating work must comply with 5    applicable codes; it may consist of a combination of any 6    of the following alternatives: 7            (A) installing a new system to replace one of the 8        following heat distribution systems: 9                (i) piping and heat radiating units, including 10            new main line venting and radiator venting; or 11                (ii) duct work, diffusers, and cold air 12            returns; or 13                (iii) any other type of existing heat 14            distribution and radiation/diffusion components; 15            or 16            (B) installing a new system to replace one of the 17        following heat generating units: 18                (i) hot water/steam boiler; 19                (ii) gas furnace; or 20                (iii) any other type of existing heat 21            generating unit. 22        (3) Plumbing. All plumbing work must comply with 23    applicable codes. Replace all or a part of the in-wall 24    supply and waste plumbing; however, main supply risers, 25    waste stacks and vents, and code-conforming waste lines 26    need not be replaced.   HB3466- 23 -LRB104 09604 HLH 19669 b1        (4) Roofing. All roofing work must comply with 2    applicable codes; it may consist of either of the 3    following alternatives, separately or in combination: 4            (A) replacing all rotted roof decks and 5        insulation; or 6            (B) replacing or repairing leaking roof membranes 7        (10% is the suggested minimum replacement of 8        membrane); restoration of the entire roof is an 9        acceptable substitute for membrane replacement. 10        (5) Exterior doors and windows. Replace the exterior 11    doors and windows. Renovation of ornate entry doors is an 12    acceptable substitute for replacement. 13        (6) Floors, walls, and ceilings. Finishes must be 14    replaced or covered over with new material. Acceptable 15    replacement or covering materials are as follows: 16            (A) floors must have new carpeting, vinyl tile, 17        ceramic, refurbished wood finish, or a similar 18        substitute; 19            (B) walls must have new drywall, including joint 20        taping and painting; or 21            (C) new ceilings must be either drywall, suspended 22        type, or a similar material. 23        (7) Exterior walls. 24            (A) replace loose or crumbling mortar and masonry 25        with new material; 26            (B) replace or paint wall siding and trim as   HB3466- 24 -LRB104 09604 HLH 19669 b1        needed; 2            (C) bring porches and balconies to a sound 3        condition; or 4            (D) any combination of (A), (B), and (C). 5        (8) Elevators. Where applicable, at least 4 of the 6    following 7 alternatives must be accomplished: 7            (A) replace or rebuild the machine room controls 8        and refurbish the elevator machine (or equivalent 9        mechanisms in the case of hydraulic elevators); 10            (B) replace hoistway electro-mechanical items 11        including: ropes, switches, limits, buffers, levelers, 12        and deflector sheaves (or equivalent mechanisms in the 13        case of hydraulic elevators); 14            (C) replace hoistway wiring; 15            (D) replace door operators and linkage; 16            (E) replace door panels at each opening; 17            (F) replace hall stations, car stations, and 18        signal fixtures; or 19            (G) rebuild the car shell and refinish the 20        interior. 21        (9) Health and safety. 22            (A) Install or replace fire suppression systems; 23            (B) install or replace security systems; or 24            (C) environmental remediation of lead-based paint, 25        asbestos, leaking underground storage tanks, or radon. 26        (10) Energy conservation improvements undertaken to   HB3466- 25 -LRB104 09604 HLH 19669 b1    limit the amount of solar energy absorbed by a building's 2    roof or to reduce energy use for the property, including, 3    but not limited to, any of the following activities: 4            (A) installing or replacing reflective roof 5        coatings (flat roofs); 6            (B) installing or replacing R-49 roof insulation; 7            (C) installing or replacing R-19 perimeter wall 8        insulation; 9            (D) installing or replacing insulated entry doors; 10            (E) installing or replacing Low E, insulated 11        windows; 12            (F) installing or replacing WaterSense labeled 13        plumbing fixtures; 14            (G) installing or replacing 90% or better sealed 15        combustion heating systems; 16            (H) installing Energy Star hot water heaters; 17            (I) installing or replacing mechanical ventilation 18        to exterior for kitchens and baths; 19            (J) installing or replacing Energy Star 20        appliances; 21            (K) installing or replacing Energy Star certified 22        lighting in common areas; or 23            (L) installing or replacing grading and 24        landscaping to promote on-site water retention if the 25        retained water is used to replace water that is 26        provided from a municipal source.   HB3466- 26 -LRB104 09604 HLH 19669 b1        (11) Accessibility improvements. All accessibility 2    improvements must comply with applicable codes. An owner 3    may make accessibility improvements to residential real 4    property to increase access for people with disabilities. 5    As used in this paragraph (11), "disability" has the 6    meaning given to that term in the Illinois Human Rights 7    Act. As used in this paragraph (11), "accessibility 8    improvements" means a home modification listed under the 9    Home Services Program administered by the Department of 10    Human Services (Part 686 of Title 89 of the Illinois 11    Administrative Code) including, but not limited to: 12    installation of ramps, grab bars, or wheelchair lifts; 13    widening doorways or hallways; re-configuring rooms and 14    closets; and any other changes to enhance the independence 15    of people with disabilities. 16        (12) Any applicant who has purchased the property in 17    an arm's length transaction not more than 90 days before 18    applying for this reduced valuation may use the cost of 19    rehabilitation or repairs required by documented code 20    violations, up to a maximum of $2 per square foot, to meet 21    the qualifying rehabilitation requirements. 22(Source: P.A. 102-175, eff. 7-29-21; 102-893, eff. 5-20-22.)